Utah statutes.
7-1-612.   Pledge or hypothecation of joint savings accounts.
The pledge or hypothecation to any depository institution of all or part of a
savings account in joint tenancy signed by any tenant or tenants whether minor
or adult, upon whose signature or signatures withdrawals may be made from the
account shall, unless the terms of the savings account provide specifically to
the contrary, be a valid pledge and transfer to the institution of that part
of the account pledged or hypothecated, and does not operate to sever or
terminate the joint and survivorship ownership of all or any part of the
account.
